test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-siema_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - siemâ: # 2B
    siemâ+N+Sg+Nom: siemâ
    siemâ+N+Sg+Gen: siemmân
    siemâ+N+Sg+Acc: siemmân
    siemâ+N+Sg+Ill: siemânân
    siemâ+N+Sg+Loc: siemânist
    siemâ+N+Sg+Com: siemânáin
    siemâ+N+Sg+Abe: siemmânttáá
    siemâ+N+Ess: siemân                   #siemânin
    siemâ+N+Par: siemâd                   #siemânid
    siemâ+N+Pl+Nom: siemâneh
    siemâ+N+Pl+Gen: siemânij
    siemâ+N+Pl+Acc: siemânijd
    siemâ+N+Pl+Ill: siemânáid
    siemâ+N+Pl+Loc: siemânijn
    siemâ+N+Pl+Com: siemânijguin
    siemâ+N+Pl+Abe: siemânijttáá
